src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
!!  !!!Numerals
!!  Numerals are morphologically nominals, only exception to noun inflection
!!  is that they form compounds with special agreeing patterns. Syntactically
!!  and semantically numerals are clearly separate subset of nominals. Some
!!  of the numerals stem variation patterns are rare to non-existent for other
!!  nominal types. Numerals have two subclasses, cardinals and ordinals.

!  TODO: unimpl.
LEXICON NUM
!!  Numerals have been split in three sections, the compounding parts
!!  of cardinals and ordinals, and the non-compounding ones:
!!€gt-norm:  Numeral
!!€  kaksikymmentäkolmetuhatta: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom#kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Par#kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Nom#tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Par # 23,000
!!€  kahdessadasneljäs: kahdes+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom#sadas+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom#neljäs+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom # 204rd
!!€  viitisenkymmentä: viitisen+Num#kymmentä # 50-ish
0  NUM_CARD_ALL  ;
0  NUM_ORD_ALL  ;
0  NUM_OTHERS  ;

!!  !!Numeral stem variation
!!  Numerals follow the same stem variation patterns as nouns, some of these
!!  being very rare to extinct for nouns. 
LEXICON NUM_YKSI
!!€gt-norm:  Numerals 31
!!€  yksi: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€  yhteen: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
!!€  yhtenä: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess
!!€  yhdessä: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
!!€  yhtä: yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Par
!!€  yksiä: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Par
!!€  yksien: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  yksiin: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill
!!€  yksinä: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess
!!€  yksissä: yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine
0:ksi  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:hte  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:hte  NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:hde  NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:h  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:ks  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:ks  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ks  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ks  NUM_FRONT_PLURALS  ;

LEXICON NUM_KAKSI
!!€gt-norm:  Numerals 31 back§
!!€  kaksi: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€  kahteen: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
!!€  kahtena: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess
!!€  kahdessa: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
!!€  kahta: kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Par
!!€  kaksia: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Par
!!€  kaksien: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  kaksiin: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill
!!€  kaksina: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess
!!€  kaksissa: kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine
0:ksi  NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:hte  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:hte  NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:hde  NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:h  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:ks  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:ks  NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ks  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ks  NUM_BACK_PLURALS  ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLME
!!€gt-norm:  Numerals 8~5
!!€  kolme: kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€  kolmeen: kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
!!€  kolmena: kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Ess
!!€  kolmessa: kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
!!€  kolmea: kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Par
!!€  kolmia: kolme+Num+Card+Pl+Par
!!€  kolmien: kolme+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  kolmiin: kolme+Num+Card+Pl+Ill
!!€  kolmina: kolme+Num+Card+Pl+Ess
!!€  kolmissa: kolme+Num+Card+Pl+Ine
0:e  NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:e  NUM_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0  NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0  NUM_BACK_PLURALS  ; 

LEXICON NUM_NELJÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Numerals 10
!!€  neljä: neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€  neljää: neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Par
!!€  neljään: neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
!!€  neljänä: neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Ess
!!€  neljässä: neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
!!€  neljiä: neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Par
!!€  neljien: neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  neljiin: neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Ill
!!€  neljinä: neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Ess
!!€  neljissä: neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Ine
!!€  neljäin: neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_PLURALS  ;

LEXICON NUM_VIISI
!!€gt-norm:  Numerals 27 front
!!€  viisi: viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€  viiteen: viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
!!€  viitenä: viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess
!!€  viidessä: viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
!!€  viisinä: viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess
!!€  viisissä: viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine
!!€  viittä: viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Par
!!€  viitten: viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  viisiä: viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Par
!!€  viisien: viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  viisiin: viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill
0:si  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:te  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:te  NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:de  NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  NUM_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:t  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:s  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:s  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

LEXICON NUM_KUUSI
!!€gt-norm:  Numerals 27 back
!!€  kuusi: kuusi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€  kuutena: kuusi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess
!!€  kuudessa: kuusi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
!!€  kuusina: kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess
!!€  kuusissa: kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine
!!€  kuutta: kuusi+Num+Card+Sg+Par
!!€  kuutten: kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  kuusia: kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Par
!!€  kuusien: kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  kuusiin: kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill
0:si  NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:te  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:te  NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:de  NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:s  NUM_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:t  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:t  NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:s  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:s  NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:s  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;


LEXICON NUM_KAHDEKSAN
!!€gt-norm:  Numerals 10n
!!€  kahdeksan: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€  kahdeksaa: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Par
!!€  kahdeksaan: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
!!€  kahdeksassa: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
!!€  kahdeksana: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Ess
!!€  kahdeksia: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Par
!!€  kahdeksien: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  kahdeksiin: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Ill
!!€  kahdeksissa: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Ine
!!€  kahdeksina: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Ess
!!€  kahdeksain: kahdeksan+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare
0:an  NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:a  NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:a  NUM_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0  NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0  NUM_BACK_PLURALS  ;

LEXICON NUM_YHDEKSÄN
!!€gt-norm:  Numerals 10n front
!!€  yhdeksän: yhdeksän+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€  yhdeksää: yhdeksän+Num+Card+Sg+Par
!!€  yhdeksään: yhdeksän+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
!!€  yhdeksässä: yhdeksän+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
!!€  yhdeksänä: yhdeksän+Num+Card+Sg+Ess
!!€  yhdeksiä: yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Par
!!€  yhdeksien: yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  yhdeksissä: yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Ine
!!€  yhdeksinä: yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Ess
!!€  yhdeksäin: yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare
0:än  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ä  NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_PLURALS  ;

LEXICON NUM_KYMMENEN
!!€gt-norm:  Numerals 32
!!€  kymmenen: kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Nom
!!€  kymmeneen: kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Ill
!!€  kymmenenä: kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Ess
!!€  kymmenessä: kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Ine
!!€  kymmentä: kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Par
!!€  kymmenten: kymmenen+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  kymmenien: kymmenen+Num+Card+Pl+Gen
!!€  kymmeniin: kymmenen+Num+Card+Pl+Ill
!!€  kymmenissä: kymmenen+Num+Card+Pl+Ine
!!€  kymmeninä: kymmenen+Num+Card+Pl+Ess
0:en  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0:e  NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0  NUM_FRONT_PLURALS  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
kahdeksan+Num:kahdeks  NUM_KAHDEKSAN  ;
kaksikymmentäyksi+Num:kaksikymmentäy  NUM_YKSI  ;
kaksi+Num:ka  NUM_KAKSI  ;
kolme+Num:kolm  NUM_KOLME  ;
kuusi+Num:kuu  NUM_KUUSI  ;
kymmenen+Num:kymmen  NUM_KYMMENEN  ;
neljä+Num:nelj  NUM_NELJÄ  ;
seitsemän+Num:seitsem  NUM_YHDEKSÄN  ;
viisi+Num:vii  NUM_VIISI  ;
yhdeksän+Num:yhdeks  NUM_YHDEKSÄN  ;
yksi+Num:y  NUM_YKSI  ;
LEXICON NUM_CARD_ALL
yksi+Num+Card:y  NUM_YKSI  ;
kaksi+Num+Card:ka  NUM_KAKSI  ;
kolme+Num+Card:kolm  NUM_KOLME  ;
neljä+Num+Card:nelj  NUM_NELJÄ  ;
viisi+Num+Card:vii  NUM_VIISI  ;
kuusi+Num+Card:kuu  NUM_KUUSI  ;
seitsemän+Num+Card:seitsem  NUM_YHDEKSÄN  ;
kahdeksan+Num+Card:kahdeks  NUM_KAHDEKSAN  ;
yhdeksän+Num+Card:yhdeks  NUM_YHDEKSÄN  ;
kymmenen+Num+Card:kymmen  NUM_KYMMENEN  ;
seitsämän+Err/Orth+Num+Card:seitsäm  NUM_YHDEKSÄN  ;
